District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2026 Revised Local Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Fiscal Year 2026 budget adjustments.
(a) The budget adopted in the Fiscal Year 2026 Local Budget Act of 2025, effective
October 23, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-51; 72 DCR 9797), is decreased by ($101,257,922) (including
($76,483,174) rescinded from local funds, ($11,547,297) rescinded from dedicated taxes,
$3,065,151 added to other funds, and ($16,292,602) rescinded from enterprise and other funds).
(b) The adjustments made by subsection (a) of this section are allocated as follows:
Governmental Direction and Support
The appropriation for Governmental Direction and Support is increased by $18,863,427
(including $17,639,787 added to local funds and $1,223,640 added to other funds), to be
allocated as follows:
(1) Board of Elections: $2,500,000 is added to local funds;
(2) Contract Appeals Board: ($7,750) is rescinded from local funds;
(3) Department of General Services: $16,216,657 is added (including $16,281,657
added to local funds, and ($65,000) rescinded from other funds);
(4) Department of Human Resources: ($356,940) is rescinded from local funds;
(5) Executive Office of the Mayor: $80,523 is added to local funds;
(6) Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions: ($141,530) is rescinded from
local funds;
(7) Office of Campaign Finance: $5,000,000 is added to local funds;
(8) Office of Contracting and Procurement: ($709,499) is rescinded from local
funds;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(9) Office of Disability Rights: ($98,221) is rescinded from local funds;
(10) Office of Risk Management: ($130,980) is rescinded from local funds;
(11) Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia: ($14,342) is
rescinded from local funds;
(12) Office of the Chief Financial Officer: $1,406,422 is added (including
$117,782 added to local funds and $1,288,640 added to other funds);
(13) Office of the Chief Technology Officer: ($2,734,678) is rescinded from local
funds;
(14) Office of the City Administrator: ($88,765) is rescinded from local funds;
and
(15) Office of the District of Columbia Auditor: ($2,057,470) is rescinded from
local funds.
Economic Development and Regulation
The appropriation for Economic Development and Regulation is increased by $9,624,480
in local funds, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Department of Housing and Community Development: ($519,585) is
rescinded from local funds;
(2) Department of Small and Local Business Development: ($142,914) is
rescinded from local funds;
(3) Housing Authority Payment: $20,459,427 is added to local funds;
(4) Housing Production Trust Fund Subsidy: ($10,000,000) is rescinded from
local funds;
(5) Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment: ($65,000) is
rescinded from local funds;
(6) Office of Planning: ($176,447) is rescinded from local funds;
(7) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development:
$107,640 is added to local funds; and
(8) Rental Housing Commission: ($38,642) is rescinded from local funds.
Public Safety and Justice
The appropriation for Public Safety and Justice is increased by $15,093,962 in local
funds, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Corrections Information Council: $155,000 is added to local funds;
(2) Criminal Justice Coordinating Council: ($61,584) is rescinded from local
funds;
(3) Department of Corrections: $2,800,000 is added to local funds;
(4) Department of Forensic Sciences: ($2,106,914) is rescinded from local funds;
(5) District of Columbia Sentencing Commission: ($54,632) is rescinded from
local funds;
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) Judicial Nomination Commission: $50,000 is added to local funds;
(7) Metropolitan Police Department: $18,700,000 is added to local funds;
(8) Office of Administrative Hearings: ($390,917) is rescinded from local funds;
(9) Office of Human Rights: ($276,884) is rescinded from local funds;
(10) Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement: ($732,435) is rescinded
from local funds;
(11) Office of Police Complaints: ($51,294) is rescinded from local funds;
(12) Office of the Chief Medical Examiner ($81,647) is rescinded from local
funds;
(13) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice: $194,342 is added
to local funds;
(14) Office of Unified Communications: ($1,366,687) is rescinded from local
funds; and
(15) Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants: ($1,682,386) is rescinded from
local funds.
Public Education System
The appropriation for Public Education System is increased by $64,456,320 in local
funds, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Department of Employment Services: ($763,407) is rescinded from local
funds;
(2) Department of Parks and Recreation: $1,676,531 is added to local funds;
(3) District of Columba Public Charter Schools: $33,100,000 is added to local
funds;
(4) District of Columbia Public Library: ($1,250,000) is rescinded from local
funds;
(5) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education: ($869,164) is rescinded from local
funds;
(6) Office of the State Superintendent of Education: $35,558,058 is added to local
funds;
(7) State Board of Education: ($13,000) is rescinded from local funds; and
(8) University of the District of Columbia Subsidy Account: ($2,982,698) is
rescinded from local funds.
Human Support Services
The appropriation for Human Support Services is decreased by ($48,210,046) in local
funds, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Child and Family Services Agency: ($5,000,000) is rescinded from local
funds;
(2) Department of Aging and Community Living: ($245,000) is rescinded from
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
local funds;
(3) Department of Health: $74,144 is added to local funds;
(4) Department of Health Care Finance: ($47,302,318) is rescinded from local
funds;
(5) Department of Human Services: $4,779,553 is added to local funds;
(6) Department on Disability Services: ($310,000) is rescinded from local funds;
and
(7) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Health and Human Services: ($206,426) is
rescinded from local funds.
Operations and Infrastructure
The appropriation for Operations and Infrastructure is increased by $28,612,964
(including $28,070,453 added to local funds and $542,511 added to other funds), to be allocated
as follows:
(1) Department of Buildings: ($478,794) is rescinded from local funds;
(2) Department of Energy and Environment: ($349,251) is rescinded from local
funds;
(3) Department of For-Hire Vehicles: ($385,000) is rescinded from local funds;
(4) Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking: ($4,166) is rescinded from
local funds;
(5) Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection: ($478,335) is rescinded
from local funds;
(6) Department of Motor Vehicles: ($2,123,976) is rescinded (including
($2,066,487) rescinded from local funds and ($57,489) rescinded from other funds);
(7) Department of Public Works: $36,343,834 is added to local funds;
(8) District Department of Transportation: ($3,882,264) is rescinded (including
($4,482,264) rescinded from local funds and $600,000 added to other funds); and
(9) Office of the People’s Counsel: ($29,084) is rescinded from local funds.
Financing and Other
The appropriation for Financing and Other is decreased by ($173,406,426) (including
($163,158,129) rescinded from local funds, ($11,547,297) rescinded from dedicated taxes, and
$1,299,000 added to other funds), to be allocated as follows:
(1) Convention Center Transfer: ($14,051,297) is rescinded from dedicated taxes;
(2) Highway Transportation Fund - Transfers: $3,803,000 is added (including
$2,504,000 added in dedicated taxes and $1,299,000 added in other funds);
(3) Pay-As-You-Go Capital Fund: $2,220,882 is added to local funds;
(4) Repayment of Emergency and Contingency Cash Reserve: $22,011,989 is
added to local funds;
(5) Repayment of Loans and Interest: ($95,000,000) is rescinded from local
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
funds; and
(6) Workforce Investments: ($92,391,000) is rescinded from local funds.
Enterprise and Other Funds
The app ropriation for Enterprise and Other Funds is decreased by ($16,292,602) in
enterprise and other funds, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Housing Production Trust Fund: ($10,000,000) is rescinded from enterprise
and other funds;
(2) University of District of Columbia: ($2,982,696) is rescinded from enterprise
and other funds; and
(3) Washington Convention and Sports Authority: ($3,309,906) is rescinded from
enterprise and other funds.
Sec. 3. Children’s National Hospital grant.
Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited
Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; D.C.
Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding a new subsection (qq) to read as follows:
“(qq) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may issu e one
or more grants to Children’s National Hospital for site assessments for a new hospital campus.”.
Sec. 4. Non-lapsing account transfers.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of law directing the deposit of revenue into, or
limiting the use of funds in, the accounts listed in the following chart, the Chief Financial Officer
shall transfer in Fiscal Year 2026 the following amounts from the certified fund balances and
other revenue in the identified accounts to the General Fund of the District of Columbia:
Agency Fund
Fund Name Total ($)
Code Number
AC0 1010191 Audit Engagement Fund (2,000,000)
AM0 1060193 Utility Payments for Non-DC Agencies (65,000)
AM0 1060430 DCPS Rental Revenue (245,827)
BD0 1010107 Targeted Homeowner Grant Program (577)
BG0 1010094 Disability Compensation (1,125,622)
BV0 1060427 Child Wealth Investment Fund (973,386)
CB0 1060094 Litigation Support Fund (1,280,147)
CE0 1010105 Library Collections Account (287,831)
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
CE0 1010109 Books from Birth (170,265)
CR0 1060267 OPLA - Special Account (457,052)
DB0 1010016 Housing Preservation Fund (623,383)
DX0 1010201 Technical Support & Assistance Fund (199,000)
EB0 1060063 Industrial Revenue Bond Program (444,879)
EB0 1011013 Comprehensive Housing Task Force (1)
EN0 1060134 Small Business Capital Access Fund (8,000)
EN0 1060303 Streetscape Loan Relief Fund (1,050)
FO0 1010043 Private Security Camera Incentive Fund (4,000)
GA0 1060135 DHHS Afterschool Programs-Copayment (34,738)
GD0 1010213 Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund (101,627)
GD0 1010110 Common Lottery Board Fund (17,641)
GD0 1010112 School Safety and Positive Climate Fund (52)
HC0 1060157 Health Facility Fee (10,627)
HC0 1060171 ICF/MR Fees and Fines (3,810)
HC0 1060050 SHPDA Fees (501)
HT0 1011007 Healthy DC Fund (5,496,682)
Individual Insurance Market Affordability and
HT0 1060386
Stability (2,145,321)
Outpatient Hospital Directed Payments Provider
HT0 1011019
Fee Fund (724,386)
Inpatient Hospital Directed Payments Provider
HT0 1011018
Fee Fund (631,766)
HT0 1060138 Assessment Fund (52,210)
HT0 1011003 Nursing Home Quality of Care Fund (3,500,000)
JA0 1060039 SSI Payback (187,170)
KA0 1060281 DC Circulator Fund - NPS Mall Route (2,024,684)
KA0 1060338 Parking Meter Pay-By-Phone Transaction Fee (455,268)
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
KA0 1060280
Authority Projects (27,128)
KE0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes (Parking Tax) (1,294,274)
KE0 1060019 Parking Meter WMATA (291,395)
KG0 1060363 Air Quality Construction Permits (719,713)
KG0 1060184 Anacostia River Clean Up Fund (542,582)
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
KG0 1060154 Storm Water Fees (95,723)
KG0 1060332 Special Energy Assessment Fund (93,589)
KG0 1010161 CRIAC Relief Fund (6,988)
KG0 1060368 Economy II (669)
KG0 1060174 Renewable Energy Development Fund (3,687,091)
KT0 1060288 Solid Waste Disposal Fee Fund (2,764,486)
KV0 1060310 Motor Vehicle Inspection Station (57,489)
LQ0 1060374 ABC - Import and Class License Fees (1,000,000)
RJ0 1060146 Subrogation Fund (148,350)
RM0 1060123 Agreement with Independent Agencies (1,500)
SR0 1060242 Insurance Assessment (596,190)
SR0 1060240 HMO Assessment (87,373)
(b) The amounts identified in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as set
forth in the approved Fiscal Year 2026 Budget, as revised by this act, and in the approved Fiscal
Year 2027 Budget and Financial Plan.
Sec. 5. Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account transfer.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law directing the deposit of revenue into, or limiting
the use of funds in, the Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account established by D.C. Official Code §
47-392.02(j-1), in Fiscal Year 2026, the Chief Financial Officer shall transfer $150 million from
the Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of
the District of Columbia to be made available as set forth in the approved Fiscal Year 2027
Budget and Financial Plan.
Sec. 6. Capital project funding rescissions and increases.
In Fiscal Year 2026, the capital project appropriations for Fiscal Year 2026 shall be
increased and decreased as set forth in the following chart:
Fund Adjustment
Subproject Detail ($s)
100018-AM0.BRM09C.EVIDENCE IMPOUND LOT RENOVATION 3030300 (15,368)
100025-AM0.BRM20C.DETENTION AREA RENOVATIONS 3030300 (1,398)
100054-AM0.FTF01C.FORT TOTTEN TRASH TRANSFER STATION 3030300 (82,038)
100063-AM0.GM102C.HVAC REPLACEMENT - DCPS 3030300 6,955,458
100064-AM0.GM120C.GENERAL MISCELLANEOUS REPAIRS - DCPS 3030300 (30,181)
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100070-AM0.GM308C.PROJECT MANAGEMENT PROF. FEES &
CONTINGE 3030300 (42,324)
100071-AM0.GM311C.HIGH SCHOOL LABOR - PROGRAM
MANAGEMENT 3030300 (376,173)
100073-AM0.GM313C.STABILIZATION CAPITAL LABOR -
PROGRAM MG 3030300 (750,000)
100112-AM0.NK337C.MINER ES- MODERNIZATION/RENOVATION 3030300 (30,000)
100122-AM0.NX839C.COOLIDGE HS CAFETERIA ADDITION 3030300 (1,492,067)
100201-AM0.RG006C.SWIMMING POOL REPLACEMENT 3030300 1,000,000
100223-AM0.SGARBC.RITA BRIGHT COMMUNITY CENTER 3030300 (330,000)
100223-AM0.SGARBC.RITA BRIGHT COMMUNITY CENTER 3030309 650,000
100251-AM0.THK17C.EMERGENCY AND TEMPORARY HOUSING
UPGRADES 3030300 2,005,591
100252-AM0.THK18C.SINGLE SHELTER REPLACEMENT 5 3030300 (40,000,000)
100270-AM0.YY142C.BRUCE MONROE ES @ PARKVIEW ES
MODERNIZATION 3030300 (13,224)
100293-AM0.YY177C.BANCROFT ES
MODERNIZATION/RENOVATION 3030300 (7,839)
100347-CE0.LB310C.GENERAL IMPROVEMENT- LIBRARIES 3030300 1,000,000
100375-EB0.AWR01C.SAINT ELIZABETHS E CAMPUS
INFRASTRUCTURE 3030309 2,000,000
100377-EB0.CHN19C.CHILDREN'S NATIONAL 3030301 1,000,000
100380-EB0.EB008C.MP-NEW COMMUNITIES 3030300 (9,500,000)
100385-EB0.EB422C.HILL EAST 3030300 (1,500,000)
100395-FA0.FAV01C.MOTOR CYCLES, SCOOTERS & TRAILERS -
MPD 3030304 (489,703)
100396-FA0.FAV02C.WRECKERS & TRAILERS - MPD 3030304 (553,268)
100398-FA0.FAV04C.MARKED CRUISERS - MPD 3030304 2,588,476
100403-FA0.PDB23C.CCTV/SHOTSPOTTER INTEGRATION 3030304 (173,440)
100405-FA0.PLT10C.CRIME FIGHTING TECHNOLOGY 3030304 990,000
100406-FA0.WAM40C.DATA WAREHOUSE & ANALYTICS
MODERNIZATION 3030304 (104)
100427-GA0.AFM04C.TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION INITIATIVE 3030304 (1,820,000)
100428-GA0.PJMCLC.CAPITAL LABOR PROJECT 3030300 (4,213,650)
100473-HT0.UMC02C.UNITED MEDICAL CENTER IMPROVEMENTS 3030300 (3,001,120)
100473-HT0.UMC02C.UNITED MEDICAL CENTER IMPROVEMENTS 3030301 (48,313)
100475-HY0.DHA21C.DEVELOPMENT AND REHABILITATION -
DCHA 3030309 (56,270,801)
100477-JA0.CMSS1C.CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM - GO BOND 3030300 (54)
100480-KA0.6EQ01C.EQUIPMENT ACQUISITION - DDOT 3030300 86,406
100480-KA0.6EQ01C.EQUIPMENT ACQUISITION - DDOT 3030301 (86,406)
100485-KA0.AF073A.MBT-2009(011)MBT-FT TOTTEN 3033534 (73,786)
100496-KA0.BEE00C.BUS PRIORITY AND EFFICIENCY INITIATIVE 3030300 179,503
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100496-KA0.BEE00C.BUS PRIORITY AND EFFICIENCY INITIATIVE 3030301 (179,503)
100496-KA0.BEE00C.BUS PRIORITY AND EFFICIENCY INITIATIVE 3030304 (967,986)
100498-KA0.BR005C.H STREET BRIDGE 3030300 (61,000,000)
100499-KA0.BRI01C.PEDESTRIAN BRIDGE - PARKSIDE 3030300 (236,118)
100499-KA0.BRI01C.PEDESTRIAN BRIDGE - PARKSIDE 3030301 (250,000)
100499-KA0.BRI01C.PEDESTRIAN BRIDGE - PARKSIDE 3030314 (791,783)
100499-KA0.BRI01C.PEDESTRIAN BRIDGE - PARKSIDE 3030332 (467,767)
100501-KA0.CA303C.STORMWATER MANAGEMENT 3030300 (585,951)
100514-KA0.CE303C.STREET REPAIR MATERIALS 3030300 4,000,000
100517-KA0.CE308C.CONCRETE, ASPHALT AND BRICK
MAINTENANCE 3030300 64,254
100517-KA0.CE308C.CONCRETE, ASPHALT AND BRICK
MAINTENANCE 3030301 (64,254)
100520-KA0.CE311C.HAZARDOUS ROAD SEGMENTS
IMPROVEMENTS POO 3030300 (498,245)
100520-KA0.CE311C.HAZARDOUS ROAD SEGMENTS
IMPROVEMENTS POO 3030301 (110,213)
100521-KA0.CE314C.BUZZARD POINT STREETS 3030300 (140,400)
100522-KA0.CEL21C.ALLEY REHABILITATION 3030300 58,274
100522-KA0.CEL21C.ALLEY REHABILITATION 3030301 (58,274)
100537-KA0.ED311C.KENNEDY STREET STREETSCAPES 3030300 142,679
100537-KA0.ED311C.KENNEDY STREET STREETSCAPES 3030301 (142,679)
100538-KA0.EDL01C.NEIGHBORHOOD STREETSCAPE 3030300 (47,094)
100543-KA0.FLD01C.PREVENTION OF FLOODING IN
BLOOMINGDALE/L 3030300 (137,273)
100543-KA0.FLD01C.PREVENTION OF FLOODING IN
BLOOMINGDALE/L 3030332 (250,976)
100543-KA0.FLD01C.PREVENTION OF FLOODING IN
BLOOMINGDALE/L 3033534 (285,989)
100546-KA0.HRBKAC.CCTV STREETLIGHT 3030304 (250,000)
100550-KA0.LMALLC.ALLEYS 3030300 (3,436,592)
100551-KA0.LMB01C.MARYLAND AVENUE STREETSCAPE 3030300 (2,637,325)
100553-KA0.LMB03C.CLEVELAND PARK STREETSCAPES 3030300 (1,208,843)
100554-KA0.LMB05C.FLORIDA AVENUE NW (9TH TO SHERMAN) 3030300 (42,001)
100556-KA0.LMB14C.FLORIDA AVENUE NE (2ND TO 14TH) 3030300 (50,337)
100557-KA0.LMB15C.PHASE II CLEVELAND PARK STORMWATER
MANAG 3030300 (10,390)
100558-KA0.LMB16C.TENLEY PLAZA 3030300 (605,736)
100559-KA0.LMB17C.VAN NESS COMMERCIAL CORRIDOR 3030300 (441,265)
100560-KA0.LMB19C.CHESTNUT ST FROM WESTERN AVE TO
OREGON A 3030300 (529,217)
100561-KA0.LMB20C.EASTERN AVE NE REHABILITATION 3030300 (202,928)
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100562-KA0.LMB23C.FLORIDA AVE AND NEW YORK AVE NE
INTERSEC 3030300 (780,717)
100562-KA0.LMB23C.FLORIDA AVE AND NEW YORK AVE NE
INTERSEC 3030301 (7,226)
100562-KA0.LMB23C.FLORIDA AVE AND NEW YORK AVE NE
INTERSEC 3033534 (27,659)
100563-KA0.LMB26C.AFRICAN AMERICAN CIVIL WAR MUSEUM
STREET 3030300 (8,590)
100565-KA0.LMB32C.MACOMB STREET, NW RECONSTRUCTION 3030300 (102,504)
100571-KA0.LMBSSC.STREETSCAPES AND BEAUTIFICATION 3030300 (3,462,109)
100571-KA0.LMBSSC.STREETSCAPES AND BEAUTIFICATION 3030301 (373,853)
100576-KA0.LMCIRC.CIRCULATOR 3030304 (2,273,444)
100577-KA0.LMDB1C.TRANSIT HUBS 3030304 (355,674)
100578-KA0.LMDBEC.BUS PRIORITY AND EFFICIENCY
INITIATIVE 3030304 (740,294)
100619-KA0.LMM10C.MONROE STREET BRIDGE ART, THE YOUNG
MAST 3030314 (4,154)
100622-KA0.LMP01C.SIDEWALK NETWORK EXPANSION 3030300 350,000
100622-KA0.LMP01C.SIDEWALK NETWORK EXPANSION 3030301 (350,000)
100623-KA0.LMPDWC.SIDEWALKS 3030300 (75)
100625-KA0.LMS06C.LIVABILITY DESIGN PROJECTS 3030300 (225,414)
100630-KA0.LMS11C.EASTERN DOWNTOWN CYCLETRACK 3030300 (948)
100633-KA0.LMS17C.GEORGETOWN LIVABILITY 3030300 (6,134)
100637-KA0.LMS27C.BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN SAFETY
IMPLEMENTA 3030300 (778,623)
100639-KA0.LMS29C.SAFETY INFRASTRUCTURE AROUND
SCHOOLS 3030300 (648,694)
100640-KA0.LMS30C.VISION ZERO IMPROVEMENT HARDENING 3030300 (144,499)
100641-KA0.LMSAFC.SAFETY & MOBILITY 3030300 (509,988)
100649-KA0.LMW40C.GI DESIGN AND INSTALLATION 3030300 (877)
100653-KA0.LRBLMC.BRIDGE REHABILITATION 3030300 (238,541)
100744-KA0.NPP01C.NEIGHBORHOOD PARKING PERF. FUND 3030300 (3)
100870-KA0.SA306C.H ST/BENNING/K ST. LINE 3030300 1,000,000
100870-KA0.SA306C.H ST/BENNING/K ST. LINE 3030301 (1,000,000)
100872-KA0.SA394C.BENNING ROAD BRIDGES AND
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT 3030300 27,558,825
100879-KA0.SR301C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 1 3030301 (194,839)
100880-KA0.SR302C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 2 3030300 (212,843)
100880-KA0.SR302C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 2 3030301 (288,464)
100882-KA0.SR304C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 4 3030301 (229,767)
100883-KA0.SR305C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 5 3030300 (80,364)
100883-KA0.SR305C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 5 3030301 (28,795)
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100886-KA0.SR308C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 8 3030301 (157,364)
100887-KA0.SR310C.STORMWATER MANAGEMENT 3030300 (719,506)
100891-KA0.TRL00C.TRAILS - MASTER PROJECT 3030300 (169,223)
100891-KA0.TRL00C.TRAILS - MASTER PROJECT 3030314 4,154
100891-KA0.TRL00C.TRAILS - MASTER PROJECT 3030332 250,976
100895-KA0.TRL50C.TRAILS 3030300 (628,692)
100941-KT0.FLW01C.DPW - FLEET VEHICLES > $275K 3030304 (611,570)
100942-KT0.FLW02C.DPW - FLEET VEHICLES > $100K 3030304 (2,691,250)
100943-KT0.FLW03C.DPW - FLEET VEHICLES > $50K 3030304 (38,360)
100944-KT0.FLW04C.DPW - FLEET VEHICLES < $50K 3030304 (343,806)
100945-KT0.FLW06C.HEAVY DUTY /OFF ROAD 3030304 1,541,279
100946-KT0.FLW07C.MEDIUM DUTY 3030304 3,251,755
100947-KT0.FLW08C.LIGHT DUTY 3030304 382,165
100954-KV0.MVS16C.DESTINY REPLACEMENT PROJECT 3030301 (3,083,000)
100954-KV0.MVS16C.DESTINY REPLACEMENT PROJECT 3030304 3,083,000
101016-UC0.BAR01C.BIDIRECTIONAL AMPLIFIERS FOR RADIO
COVER 3030304 (616,069)
101020-UC0.FDA01C.FIRSTNET DISTRIBUTED ANTENNA SYSTEM
DEPL 3030304 (417,126)
101124-KA0.LMB28C.S ST. FROM 4TH ST. TO 7TH ST. NW STREETS 3030300 (1,500,000)
101125-KA0.LMB36C.LANGSTON AND CARVER STREETSCAPES 3030300 (2,756)
101142-EAST CAPITOL ST. CORRIDOR MOBILITY & SAFETY 3030300 (1)
101149-M ST. SE/SW SAFETY AND MOBILITY IMPROVEMENTS 3030300 (7,225)
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3030300 406,883
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3030301 (406,883)
101193-KA0.LMB56C.I-295 RECONNECTING COMMUNITIES 3030300 719,286
101193-KA0.LMB56C.I-295 RECONNECTING COMMUNITIES 3030301 (719,286)
101194-KA0.LMS99C.SAFE STREETS FOR STUDENTS 3030300 (3,534,972)
101224-KA0.SOUTH DAKOTA AVENUE SAFETY IMPROVEMENT 3030300 362,566
101224-KA0.SOUTH DAKOTA AVENUE SAFETY IMPROVEMENT 3033534 387,434
101227-ALASKA & GERANIUM STREET SAFETY IMPROVEMENT 3030300 (300,000)
101236-KA0.TRAFFIC SAFETY INPUTS 3030300 (5,000,000)
101249-CAPITAL ONE 3030309 40,000,000
101253-SHAW-HOWARD UNIVERSITY INFRASTRUCTURE 3030309 (25,000,000)
101256-BLACK LIVES MATTER PLAZA ASSET PRESERVATION 3030300 (4,916)
101257-CE0.BRIGHTWOOD PARK-MANOR PARK LIBRARY 3030300 (1,000,000)
101266-VSR24- V STREET RENOVATION 3030300 (2,000,000)
101387-DPW FORT TOTTEN TRASH TRANSFER STATION 3030300 (38,648)
101394-FA0.FAV06C.ARMORED PERSONNEL CARRIER 3030304 (72,000)
101404-RFK CAMPUS 3030300 (7,761,098)
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
101406-ROCK CREEK TENNIS CENTER RENOVATION AND
ADVISE 3030300 (9,000,000)
101406-ROCK CREEK TENNIS CENTER RENOVATION AND
ADVISE 3030301 9,000,000
101445-HIGH-INJURY NETWORK QUICK DELIVERY PROJECTS 3030300 750,000
101450-METROPOLITAN BRANCH TRAIL FROM 1ST PLACE NE TO
VINE ST NW 3030300 (500,000)
101457-DC MUNICIPAL REGS MODERNIZATION 3030304 750,000
ADDITIONAL BRIDGE HOUSING LOCATION 3030300 25,000,000
EPM_RM01004-RELOCATION OF COMPREHENSIVE PSYCHIATRIC
EMERGENCY PROGRAM 3030300 500,000
NEW-STADIUM-ARMORY STATION CAPACITY IMPROVEMENTS 3030300 10,041,155
UMC DEMO 3030309 7,700,000
Sec. 7. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 8. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
12